Arkansas, session 2025, SB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-404(b), concerning exclusions from
gross income under the Income Tax Act of 1929, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(36) A gain by a taxpayer resulting from the acquisition of real
*JLL173*
03-12-2025 10:16:19 JLL173

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 SB204
property by an entity with the power of eminent domain under the right of
eminent domain or threat of condemnation under Title 18, Chapter 15 or § 27-
67-301 et seq.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/C. Penzo




























03-12-2025 10:16:19 JLL173